Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 301.
Intestate estate.

Any part of a decedent’s estate not effectively disposed of by will passes by intestate succession to the decedent’s heirs, except as modified by the decedent’s will.

A decedent’s will may expressly exclude or limit the right of an individual or a class to inherit property. If such an individual or member of such a class survives the decedent, the share of the decedent’s intestate estate that would have passed to that individual or member of such a class passes subject to any such limitation or exclusion set forth in the will.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the surviving spouse of the decedent from making the election and receiving the benefits provided by section 319 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 302.
Dower and curtesy abolished.

The estates of dower and curtesy are abolished.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 303.
Afterborn heirs.

For purposes of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title relating to wills, an individual in gestation at a particular time is treated as living at that time if the individual lives 120 hours or more after birth.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.